test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-wahkw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - wâhkw - ok : # -m animate noun, roe
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg: wâhkw
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwâhkom
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwâhkom
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: owâhkoma
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: owâhkomiyiwa
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwâhkominân
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwâhkominaw
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwâhkomiwâw
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: owâhkomiwâwa
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: owâhkomiyiwa

     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl: wâhkwak
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwâhkomak
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwâhkomak
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: owâhkoma
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: owâhkomiyiwa
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwâhkominânak
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwâhkominawak
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwâhkomiwâwak
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: owâhkomiwâwa
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: owâhkomiyiwa

     wâhkw+N+AN+Obv: wâhkwa
     wâhkw+N+AN+Loc: wâhkohk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwâhkomihk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwâhkomihk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: owâhkomihk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: owâhkomiyihk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: niwâhkominâhk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwâhkominâhk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwâhkomiwâhk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: owâhkomiwâhk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: owâhkomiyihk

     wâhkw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: wâhkwis
     wâhkw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: wâhkwisak
